Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 9 Agencies and Adjusters

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 122 to 182.

Public regulation or control of insurance agents or brokers, 10 ALR2d 950.

Liability of insurance company for negligent operation of automobile by agent or broker, 36 ALR2d 261.

Liability of insurance company for libel or slander by its agents, 55 ALR2d 828.

Authority of insurance agent to borrow money for principal, 55 ALR2d 1215.

Construction of insurance agency or brokerage contract dealing with computation of commissions on renewal premiums, 78 ALR2d 760.

Coverage and omissions in insurance brokers' and agents' errors and omissions policy, 89 ALR2d 1192.

Undertakers as agents of insurance companies, 89 ALR2d 1338.

Right of insurance agent to sue in his own name for unpaid premium, 90 ALR2d 1291.

Insurance agent's statement or conduct indicating that insurer's cancellation of policy shall not take effect as binding on insurer, 3 ALR3d 1135.

Transmission of insurance policy to agent as satisfying provision requiring delivery to insured, 19 ALR3d 953.

Validity of indemnity insurance contract, 27 ALR3d 663.

Reformation of insurance policy to correctly identify risks and causes of loss, 32 ALR3d 661.

Liability of insurance agent for exposure of insurer to liability because of issuance of policy beyond authority or contrary to instructions, 35 ALR3d 899.

Insurance agent's right to commissions on renewal premiums, 36 ALR3d 958.

Insurer's tort liability for acts of adjuster seeking to obtain settlement or release, 39 ALR3d 739.

Person to whom renewal premium may be paid or tendered so as to bind insurer, 42 ALR3d 751.

Insured's ratification, after loss, of policy procured without his authority, knowledge or consent, 52 ALR3d 235.

Liability of insurance agent to insured for failure to procure insurance, 64 ALR3d 398.

Liability of insurance agent on ground of inadequacy of coverage procured, 72 ALR3d 704.

When is termination of insurance agency contract wrongful, so as to make insurer liable to agent, 5 ALR4th 1080.

Provisions of insurance company's contract with independent insurance agent restricting competitive placements by agent as illegal restraint of trade under state law, 42 ALR4th 1072.

Liability of independent or public insurance adjuster to insured for conduct in adjusting claim, 50 ALR4th 900.

Necessity of expert testimony to show standard of care in negligence action against insurance agent or broker, 52 ALR4th 1232.

Liability of tortfeasor's insurance agent or broker to injured party for failure to procure or maintain liability insurance, 72 ALR4th 1095.

Liability of insurer or agent of insurer for failure to advise insured as to coverage needs, 88 ALR4th 249.

Liability of insurance agent or broker for placing insurance with insolvent carrier, 42 ALR5th 199.

44 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 178 to 217.